public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-IT-oxt/dictionaries/vec-IT.aff
FLAG long
# baxe:
# tèma 2 (from T1: aŧento PVT > VT)
# tèma 4 (from T1: senŧa aŧento)
# tèma 5 (from T1: aŧento PVT > VT, then T2: à > é | (é > í) | (í > é))
# tèma 6 (from T1: aŧento PVT > VT, then T2: é > ú)
# tèma 7 (from T1: aŧento PVT > VT, then T2: í > é)
# -àr, -ér, -ír, -ír/is: skomenŧiando da 'l infenío
# '-er: skomenŧiando da 'l indikativo futuro de prima parsona singolar
SFX t0 Y 297
SFX t0 r va/J1 [aei]r	ds:indicative+imperfect is:first+singular	# T2 + (v)a
SFX t0 ar àvami/I1 ar	ds:indicative+imperfect is:first+singular ds:interrogative	# T2 + (v)a
SFX t0 er évami/I1 er	ds:indicative+imperfect is:first+singular ds:interrogative	# T2 + (v)a
SFX t0 ir ívami/I1 ir	ds:indicative+imperfect is:first+singular ds:interrogative	# T2 + (v)a
SFX t0 r a/J1I1 [ae]r	ds:indicative+imperfect is:first+singular	# T2 + (v)a
SFX t0 r a/J1I1 [aeiouàèéíòóúïü]ir	ds:indicative+imperfect is:first+singular	# T2 + (v)a
SFX t0 ir ía/J1I1 [^aeiouàèéíòóúïü]ir	ds:indicative+imperfect is:first+singular	# T2 + (v)a
SFX t0 rò 0 erò	ds:infinitive+simple	# T1, buranèl
SFX t0 rò va/J1 erò	ds:indicative+imperfect is:first+singular	# T2 + (v)a
SFX t0 erò évami/I1 erò	ds:indicative+imperfect is:first+singular ds:interrogative	# T2 + (v)a
SFX t0 rò a/J1I1 erò	ds:indicative+imperfect is:first+singular	# T2 + (v)a
SFX t0 r vo/J1 [aei]r	ds:indicative+imperfect is:first+singular	# T2 + (v)o
SFX t0 ar àvomi/I1 ar	ds:indicative+imperfect is:first+singular ds:interrogative	# T2 + (v)o
SFX t0 er évomi/I1 er	ds:indicative+imperfect is:first+singular ds:interrogative	# T2 + (v)o
SFX t0 ir ívomi/I1 ir	ds:indicative+imperfect is:first+singular ds:interrogative	# T2 + (v)o
SFX t0 r o/J1I1 [ae]r	ds:indicative+imperfect is:first+singular	# T2 + (v)o
SFX t0 r o/J1I1 [aeiouàèéíòóúïü]ir	ds:indicative+imperfect is:first+singular	# T2 + (v)o
SFX t0 ir ío/J1I1 [^aeiouàèéíòóúïü]ir	ds:indicative+imperfect is:first+singular	# T2 + (v)o
SFX t0 rò vo/J1 erò	ds:indicative+imperfect is:first+singular	# T2 + (v)o
SFX t0 erò évomi/I1 erò	ds:indicative+imperfect is:first+singular ds:interrogative	# T2 + (v)o
SFX t0 rò o/J1I1 erò	ds:indicative+imperfect is:first+singular	# T2 + (v)o
SFX t0 ar àvimo/J2I2 ar	ds:indicative+imperfect is:first+plural	# T2 + (v)imo
SFX t0 ar àimo/J2I2 ar	ds:indicative+imperfect is:first+plural	# T2 + (v)imo
SFX t0 er évimo/J2I2 er	ds:indicative+imperfect is:first+plural	# T2 + (v)imo
SFX t0 er éimo/J2I2 er	ds:indicative+imperfect is:first+plural	# T2 + (v)imo
SFX t0 erò évimo/J2I2 erò	ds:indicative+imperfect is:first+plural	# T2 + (v)imo
SFX t0 erò éimo/J2I2 erò	ds:indicative+imperfect is:first+plural	# T2 + (v)imo
SFX t0 ir ívimo/J2I2 ir	ds:indicative+imperfect is:first+plural	# T2 + (v)imo
SFX t0 ir íimo/J2I2 ir	ds:indicative+imperfect is:first+plural	# T2 + (v)imo
SFX t0 ar évimo/J2I2 ar	ds:indicative+imperfect is:first+plural	# T2 + (v)imo, T2 = T1: aŧento PVT > VT | à > é
SFX t0 ar éimo/J2I2 ar	ds:indicative+imperfect is:first+plural	# T2 + (v)imo, T2 = T1: aŧento PVT > VT | à > é
SFX t0 r vi/J3 [aei]r	ds:indicative+imperfect is:second+singular	# T2 + (v)i
SFX t0 ar àvitu/I3 ar	ds:indicative+imperfect is:second+singular ds:interrogative	# T2 + (v)i
SFX t0 er évitu/I3 er	ds:indicative+imperfect is:second+singular ds:interrogative	# T2 + (v)i
SFX t0 ir ívitu/I3 ir	ds:indicative+imperfect is:second+singular ds:interrogative	# T2 + (v)i
SFX t0 r i/J3I3 [ae]r	ds:indicative+imperfect is:second+singular	# T2 + (v)i
SFX t0 r i/J3I3 [aeiouàèéíòóúïü]ir	ds:indicative+imperfect is:second+singular	# T2 + (v)i
SFX t0 ir íi/J3I3 [^aeiouàèéíòóúïü]ir	ds:indicative+imperfect is:second+singular	# T2 + (v)i
SFX t0 rò vi/J3 erò	ds:indicative+imperfect is:second+singular	# T2 + (v)i
SFX t0 erò évitu/I3 erò	ds:indicative+imperfect is:second+singular ds:interrogative	# T2 + (v)i
SFX t0 rò i/J3I3 erò	ds:indicative+imperfect is:second+singular	# T2 + (v)i
SFX t0 r vi/J4 [aei]r	ds:indicative+imperfect is:second+plural	# T2 + (v)i
SFX t0 ar àvïu/I4 ar	ds:indicative+imperfect is:second+plural ds:interrogative	# T2 + (v)i
SFX t0 er évïu/I4 er	ds:indicative+imperfect is:second+plural ds:interrogative	# T2 + (v)i
SFX t0 ir ívïu/I4 ir	ds:indicative+imperfect is:second+plural ds:interrogative	# T2 + (v)i
SFX t0 r i/J4I4 [ae]r	ds:indicative+imperfect is:second+plural	# T2 + (v)i
SFX t0 r i/J4I4 [aeiouàèéíòóúïü]ir	ds:indicative+imperfect is:second+plural	# T2 + (v)i
SFX t0 ir íi/J4I4 [^aeiouàèéíòóúïü]ir	ds:indicative+imperfect is:second+plural	# T2 + (v)i
SFX t0 rò vi/J4 erò	ds:indicative+imperfect is:second+plural	# T2 + (v)i
SFX t0 erò évïu/I4 erò	ds:indicative+imperfect is:second+plural ds:interrogative	# T2 + (v)i
SFX t0 rò i/J4I4 erò	ds:indicative+imperfect is:second+plural	# T2 + (v)i
SFX t0 r va [aei]r	ds:indicative+imperfect is:third	# T2 + (v)a
SFX t0 r a [ae]r	ds:indicative+imperfect is:third	# T2 + (v)a
SFX t0 r a [aeiouàèéíòóúïü]ir	ds:indicative+imperfect is:third	# T2 + (v)a
SFX t0 ir ía [^aeiouàèéíòóúïü]ir	ds:indicative+imperfect is:third	# T2 + (v)a
SFX t0 rò va erò	ds:indicative+imperfect is:third	# T2 + (v)a
SFX t0 rò a erò	ds:indicative+imperfect is:third	# T2 + (v)a
SFX t0 r se [aei]r	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:first+singular	# T2 + se
SFX t0 rò se erò	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:first+singular	# T2 + se
SFX t0 ar àsimo ar	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:first+plural	# T2 + simo
SFX t0 er ésimo er	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:first+plural	# T2 + simo
SFX t0 erò ésimo erò	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:first+plural	# T2 + simo
SFX t0 ir ísimo ir	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:first+plural	# T2 + simo
SFX t0 ar esemo ar	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:first+plural	# T2 + simo, coxòto
SFX t0 r semo er	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:first+plural	# T2 + simo, coxòto
SFX t0 rò semo erò	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:first+plural	# T2 + simo, coxòto
SFX t0 ir esemo ir	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:first+plural	# T2 + simo, coxòto
SFX t0 r si/J3 [aei]r	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:second+singular	# T2 + si
SFX t0 rò si/J3 erò	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:second+singular	# T2 + si
SFX t0 ar àsitu/I3 ar	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:second+singular ds:interrogative	# T2 + si
SFX t0 er ésitu/I3 er	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:second+singular ds:interrogative	# T2 + si
SFX t0 ir ísitu/I3 ir	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:second+singular ds:interrogative	# T2 + si
SFX t0 erò ésitu/I3 erò	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:second+singular ds:interrogative	# T2 + si
SFX t0 r si [aei]r	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:second+singular	# T2 + si
SFX t0 rò si erò	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:second+singular	# T2 + si
SFX t0 r si [aei]r	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:second+plural	# T2 + si
SFX t0 rò si erò	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:second+plural	# T2 + si
SFX t0 ar esé ar	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:second+plural	# T2 + si, coxòto
SFX t0 r sé er	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:second+plural	# T2 + si, coxòto
SFX t0 ir esé ir	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:second+plural	# T2 + si, coxòto
SFX t0 rò sé erò	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:second+plural	# T2 + si, coxòto
SFX t0 r se [aei]r	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:third	# T2 + se
SFX t0 rò se erò	ds:subjunctive+imperfect is:third	# T2 + se
SFX t0 r sto/A1 [aei]r	ds:participle+passive+weak is:singular+masculine	# T2 + st[oiae]
SFX t0 rò sto/A1 erò	ds:participle+passive+weak is:singular+masculine	# T2 + st[oiae]
SFX t0 r ndo/P0 ar	ds:gerund+simple	# T2 + ndo = T7 + ndo
SFX t0 r ndo/P0 [ei]r	ds:gerund+simple	# T2 + ndo = T7 + ndo
SFX t0 er ando/P0 er	ds:gerund+simple	# T2 + ndo = T7 + ndo
SFX t0 ar àndoge/Q0 ar	ds:gerund+simple ds:pronomenal+genitive+locative	# T2 + ndo = T7 + ndo
SFX t0 er éndoge/Q0 er	ds:gerund+simple ds:pronomenal+genitive+locative	# T2 + ndo = T7 + ndo
SFX t0 er àndoge/Q0 er	ds:gerund+simple ds:pronomenal+genitive+locative	# T2 + ndo = T7 + ndo
SFX t0 ir índoge/Q0 ir	ds:gerund+simple ds:pronomenal+genitive+locative	# T2 + ndo = T7 + ndo
SFX t0 ir àndoge/Q0 ir	ds:gerund+simple ds:pronomenal+genitive+locative	# T2 + ndo = T7 + ndo
SFX t0 rò ndo/P0 erò	ds:gerund+simple	# T2 + ndo
