public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-IT-oxt/dictionaries/vec-IT.dic
apaltar/t0l0n0t1P0PlQ0Ql	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
bagordar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
dexbaraŧar/t0l0n0t1P0PlQ0Ql	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:des
belir/t0l0n0t1P0PlQ0Ql.0	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
bindeƚar/t070t1P0P7Q0Q7-1+0*0	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
rabonbar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:re
xbravexar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:s
inbukoƚar/t070t1P0P7Q0Q7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:in
scoar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:s
dobar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
inxeƚoxir/t070t1P0P7Q0Q7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:in
rinđovenir/t0l0n0t1P0PlQ0Ql	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:in dp:re
asuefar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7xFxGxH-1	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:asue
devarsifegar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:devèrso
fiapar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7+0	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
fojar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7-1^6*0	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
fratixar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
ingabeƚar/t070t1P0P7Q0Q7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:in
garofolir/t0l0n0t1P0PlQ0Ql+0	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
xgrandar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:s
xgrixar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:s
rinprovarar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:re
josolar/t0l0n0t1P0PlQ0Ql*0	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
kalserar/t0l0n0t1P0PlQ0Ql	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
karexar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
kausionar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
skomedonar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:s
kordonar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
krokolar/t0l0n0t1P0PlQ0Ql*0	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
kunar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7*0	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
xlargixar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:s
aƚetar/t070t1P0P7Q0Q7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:a
ƚisiar/t070t1P0P7Q0Q7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
peƚustrar/t070t1P0P7Q0Q7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
manđolar/t0l0n0t1P0PlQ0Ql*0	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
maxarir/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7+0	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
miedegar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
xmordegar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:s
negosiar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
ñarar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7-1+0*0	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
orixenar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
inpaƚudar/t070t1P0P7Q0Q7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:in
pastrocar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7+0	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
penxerò/t0n0l070p4l474J1I1-0+0.0	po:verb ds:indicative+future is:first+singular st:pénxer
pevarar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7+0	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
spipoƚar/t070t1P0P7Q0Q7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:s
sponđejar/t0l0n0t1P0PlQ0Ql	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:s
pretar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7-1*0	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
ramanŧinar/t0l0n0t1P0PlQ0Ql	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
ridasar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7*0	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
ruxenir/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7-1+0	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
sarcar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
seneɉar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
siringar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple is:talian
skrimiatoƚar/t070t1P0P7Q0Q7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
insordar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:in
spiumaŧar/t0l0n0t1P0PlQ0Ql	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
stivalar/t0l0n0t1P0PlQ0Ql+0	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
tapeŧar/t0l0n0t1P0PlQ0Ql	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
tonixar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
ŧapegar/t0l0n0t1P0PlQ0Ql	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
simigar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
ŧupar/t0l0n0t1P0PlQ0Ql+0	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
soravansar/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:sora
konviñir/t0l070n0t1P0PlP7Q0QlQ7-1*0	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:kon
